Hawaii statutes.
§425-131 Partner's power to dissociate;
wrongful dissociation. (a) A partner has the power to dissociate at any
time, rightfully or wrongfully, by express will pursuant to section 425-130(1).

(b) A partner's dissociation is wrongful only
if:

(1) It is in breach of an express provision of the
partnership agreement; or

(2) In the case of a partnership for a definite term
or particular undertaking, before the expiration of the term or the completion
of the undertaking:

(A) The partner withdraws by express will,
unless the withdrawal follows within ninety days after another partner's
dissociation by death or otherwise under section 425-130(6) to (10) or wrongful
dissociation under this subsection;

(B) The partner is expelled by judicial
determination under section 425-130(5);

(C) The partner is dissociated by becoming a
debtor in bankruptcy; or

(D) In the case of a partner who is not an
individual, trust other than a business trust, or estate, the partner is
expelled or otherwise dissociated because it wilfully dissolved or terminated.

(c) A partner who wrongfully dissociates is
liable to the partnership and to the other partners for damages caused by the
dissociation. The liability is in addition to any other obligation of the
partner to the partnership or to the other partners. [L 1999, c 284, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next